Utah statutes.
36-11-307.   Ethics training course for lobbyists -- Internet availability -- Content -- Participation tracking -- Penalty.

(1)  The lieutenant governor shall develop and maintain an ethics training course for lobbyists.

(2)  The ethics training course shall include training materials and exercises that are available on the Internet to lobbyists and to the public.

(3)  The ethics training course shall be designed to assist lobbyists in understanding and complying with current ethical and campaign finance requirements under state law, legislative rules, and federal law.

(4)  The ethics training course shall include provisions for verifying when a lobbyist has successfully completed key training exercises.

(5)  A lobbyist shall successfully complete the key training exercises of the ethics training course once each year.

(6)  A lobbyist who does not complete the training required by this section is subject to a penalty as provided in Section 36-11-401.

